Hawaii statutes.
PART IA. FORECLOSURE BY ACTION

Note

Sections 667-1 to 667-13 designated as Part
I by L 1998, c 122, §2.

This is former Part I that was renumbered
as Part IA and amended by L 2012, c 182, §3(5).

Law Journals and Reviews

Mortgagor Protection Laws: A Proposal for
Mortgage Foreclosure Reform in Hawai‘i. 24 UH L. Rev. 245 (2001).

§667-1.5 Foreclosure by
action. The circuit court may assess the amount due upon a mortgage,
whether of real or personal property, without the intervention of a jury, and
shall render judgment for the amount awarded, and the foreclosure of the
mortgage. Execution may be issued on the judgment, as ordered by the court.
[CC 1859, §1231; RL 1925, §2887; RL 1935, §4720; RL 1945, §12420; RL 1955,
§336-1; HRS §667-1; am L 1972, c 90, §9(a); ren L
2012, c 182, §3(6)]

Case Notes

In the absence of direction from mortgagor,
mortgagee may appropriate payment on mortgage to either principal or interest,
or to another debt due to mortgagee. 5 H. 405 (1885).

Guardian of heirs of mortgagor justified in
assenting to application of proceeds of sale of land of deceased ancestor to
payment of debt, secured or unsecured. 28 H. 81, 85 (1924).

Burden of guarantor sued for deficiency
after foreclosure to show foreclosure price paid by mortgagee inadequate. 31
H. 34 (1929).

Economic depression alone not enough to
refuse remedy of foreclosure. 32 H. 835 (1933). Upset price. 32 H. 835
(1933).

Decree of foreclosure is a final judgment
for purposes of appellate review. 55 H. 414, 520 P.2d 431 (1974); 57 H. 557,
560 P.2d 490 (1977).

The judicial foreclosure system in Hawaii,
pursuant to this section, is not clearly, manifestly and unmistakably violative
of due process; considering the two basic elements of procedural due process--notice
and the opportunity to be heard--appellants were afforded due process. 94 H.
422 (App.), 16 P.3d 827 (2000).

Cited: 40 H. 269, 274 (1953).

See 33 H. 1 (1934); 34 H. 283 (1937).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next